District of Columbia statutes.
32-1452

Prohibited actions of employer.

An employer shall not:

(1)

Require, as a condition of employment, that an employee refrain from inquiring about, disclosing, comparing, or otherwise discussing the employees wages or the wages of another employee;

(2)

Discharge, discipline, interfere with, or otherwise retaliate against an employee who inquires about, discloses, compares, or otherwise discusses the employees wages or the wages of another employee or is believed by the employer to have done so; or

(3)

Prohibit or attempt to prohibit an employee from lodging a complaint, or testifying, assisting, or participating in an investigation or proceeding, related to a violation of this chapter.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 3, 62 DCR 9